Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB575.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 75 heading of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:CHAPTER 75[PROFESSIONAL AND OCCUPATIONAL] LICENSES ANDCREDITS FOR MILITARY SERVICE AND TRAININGSection 2. Chapter 75 of Title 51 is amended by adding a subchapter heading to read:SUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 3. Section 7501 of Title 51 is amended by adding a definition to read:12345678910111213141516171819 § 7501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:" Institution of higher education." Any of the following: (1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A of the Public School Code of 1949.(3) The Pennsylvania State University, the University of Pittsburgh, Temple University, Lincoln University or any other institution designated as State-related by the Commonwealth.(4) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(5) A college established under Article XIX-G of the Public School Code of 1949.(6) An institution of higher education located in and incorporated or chartered by the Commonwealth and entitled to confer degrees as provided under 24 Pa.C.S. § 6505 (relating to power to confer degrees) and as provided for by the standards and qualifications prescribed by the State Board of Education under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 65 (relating to private colleges, universities and seminaries).(7) A private school licensed under the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act.(8) A foreign corporation approved to operate an educational enterprise under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 36 (relating to 20250HB0575PN0959 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 foreign corporation standards).* * *Section 4. Chapter 75 of Title 51 is amended by adding a subchapter heading to read:SUBCHAPTER BPROFESSIONAL AND OCCUPATIONAL LICENSESSection 5. Section 7502 of Title 51 is renumbered to read:§ [7502] 7511. Retention of licenses and certifications of persons entering military service.(a) General rule.--Any person licensed or certified by the Department of State, Department of Labor and Industry, Department of Education, Insurance Department, Department of Banking, Department of Health, Department of Agriculture or the Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission or pursuant to the act of October 10, 1974 (P.L.705, No.235), known as the Lethal Weapons Training Act, to practice any profession or to work at any trade or occupation, who heretofore has or shall thereafter enlist or be inducted or drafted into the military or naval service of the United States in time of war or preparation for national defense during a national emergency, shall not thereby forfeit his or her current license or registration and shall be exempt from any continuing educational requirements or in-service training requirements.(b) Renewal of license or certification following discharge.--A person shall, after presentation of a discharge from service described under subsection (a) within one year from the date of discharge and payment of the fee prescribed by law for the current renewal period only, be entitled to a renewal of his or her license, certification or registration in the same manner as though:20250HB0575PN0959 - 3 - ◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The renewal had been made prior to the expiration of his or her last preceding renewal.(2) All intermediate renewal fees had been paid.(3) All continuing education or in-service training requirements have been satisfied.(c) Exemptions.--A veteran's military service, education, training and service experience shall be taken into consideration by the entities listed under subsection (a) to determine whether a licensing or certification requirement has been met by or can otherwise be waived by reason of that military service, education, training or experience. The veteran shall only be required to meet a licensing or certification requirement which has not been met by or waived under this subsection.Section 6. Section 7503.1 of Title 51 is amended to read:§ [7503.1] 7512. Applicability of [chapter] subchapter.The Pennsylvania Supreme Court may extend this [chapter] subchapter to those licensed to practice law in this Commonwealth.Section 7. Chapter 75 of Title 51 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER CACADEMIC CREDITSec.7521. Policy for the award of academic credit for military training.§ 7521. Policy for the award of academic credit for military training.(a) Adoption.--The Department of Education shall adopt a policy for the award of academic credit to a student enrolled in 20250HB0575PN0959 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an institution of higher education who has successfully completed a military training course or program , or who has obtained experiential learning, as part of the student's military service that is applicable to the student's certificate or degree requirements and is:(1) recommended for academic credit by a national higher education association that provides academic credit recommendations for military training courses or programs;(2) noted on the student's military transcript issued by any of the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component or National Guard; or(3) otherwise documented in writing by any of the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component or National Guard.(b) Duties.--The Department of Education shall develop, maintain and disseminate to each institution of higher education a list of military training courses and programs that the Department of Education has deemed qualified for the award of academic credit.(c) Provision of copy.--Each institution of higher education shall make a copy of the Department of Education's policy for the award of academic credit for military training courses or programs available in the public catalog of the institution of higher education . Section 8. Section 2167(d) of Title 53 is amended to read:§ 2167. Police training.* * *(d) Mandatory waiver request.--If a police officer is unable to attend in-service training due to service in the military or National Guard or as a result of injury sustained in service as 20250HB0575PN0959 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a police officer, the officer's employer shall request a waiver under section 2164(6) (relating to powers and duties of commission). A police officer whose employer fails to request a waiver as required under this subsection shall not be decertified unless, upon return to service, the officer fails to participate in such in-service training as the commission deems appropriate in accordance with this chapter and 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 75 (relating to [professional and occupational] licenses and credits for military service and training).Section 9. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0575PN0959 - 6 - 12345678910